Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1209
Entity possessing or controlling remains or goods on August 25, 1989; duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Nebraska law, any institution, agency, organization, or other entity in this state which receives funding or official recognition from the state or any of its political subdivisions and which has in its possession or control on August 25, 1989, any disinterred human skeletal remains or burial goods of American Indian origin which are reasonably identifiable as to familial or tribal origin, regardless of their present location, shall return any such remains and goods to the relative or Indian tribe for reburial, upon request of such relative or Indian tribe, or otherwise cause such remains and goods to be reinterred pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of section 12-1208 within one year of receiving such request, except that any such entity which has, prior to January 1, 1989, received a written request from any relative or Indian tribe for the return of such reasonably identifiable remains and goods shall return to such relative or Indian tribe for reburial all such remains and goods by September 10, 1990.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 9.